Nebraska, session 109, LB276.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB276 LB276
2025 2025
Section 1. Sections 1 to 16 of this act shall be known and may be
cited as the Municipal Police Oversight Act.
Sec. 2. The Legislature finds that oversight of municipal law
enforcement agencies is a matter of state concern, particularly in larger
cities which maintain sizeable police forces. Municipal law enforcement
agencies are the primary agencies providing enforcement of criminal laws
adopted under state law. Under the Civil Service Act, certain cities
having a population of more than five thousand inhabitants which employ
full-time police officers must maintain a civil service commission. The
Legislature finds that certain cities should also establish oversight
boards to monitor, investigate, and evaluate police standards and
practices.
Sec. 3. For purposes of the Municipal Police Oversight Act:
(1) City means any city of the metropolitan class or city of the
primary class, including any city which has adopted a home rule charter
pursuant to sections 2 to 5 of Article XI of the Constitution of
Nebraska, which employs full-time police officers; and
(2) Oversight board means a citizen police oversight board created
under section 4 of this act.
Sec. 4. On or before January 1, 2028, each city shall, by
ordinance, create a citizen police oversight board. The ordinance shall
specify the composition, jurisdiction, and powers of the oversight board
as provided in the Municipal Police Oversight Act.
Sec. 5. Each oversight board shall be composed of seven members of
the public who shall serve for terms of five years. The members of the
oversight board shall be appointed by the city council and shall consist
of individuals who represent a cross-section of the residents of the
city. Any member of the oversight board shall be eligible for
reappointment to the oversight board at the end of the term for which
appointed. No person shall serve on an oversight board if, at the time of
appointment, during the term for which appointed, or at any time prior to
-2-

LB276 LB276
2025 2025
such appointment, such person is or was affiliated with or employed by
any law enforcement agency, department, or office of the city for which
the oversight board was created or of the county in which the city is
located.
Sec. 6. Each oversight board shall be mandated and empowered by
ordinance to:
(1) Investigate and address grievances and complaints filed by
members of the public against the police department of the city and any
officers of such department;
(2) Investigate and address grievances and complaints relating to
discrimination based on race, ethnicity, or gender and sexual harassment
filed by employees of the police department of such city against any
other officers or supervisory personnel of such department;
(3) Investigate all shootings involving police officers of such
city;
(4) Independently investigate all cases of alleged mistreatment or
misconduct by the police department of such city and any officers of such
department that come to the attention of the oversight board, regardless
of whether those cases are the subject of any specific formal complaint
or grievance;
(5) Identify all instances of police misconduct by police officers
of such city and report findings and recommendations in those cases to
the police department, the mayor, and the city council of such city and
all federal and state registries of police misconduct;
(6) When appropriate, provide the police department of such city and
other law enforcement agencies with evidence in support of any criminal
proceedings, disciplinary proceedings, or other management actions or
measures;
(7) Provide the police department of such city with feedback from
members of the public who have direct experience with police practices;
and
-3-

LB276 LB276
2025 2025
(8) Monitor, investigate, and evaluate policing standards, patterns,
and practices of the police department of such city.
Sec. 7. (1) An oversight board may summarily dismiss a grievance or
complaint filed by a member of the public without investigation only when
the oversight board determines that:
(a) The complainant's interest is not sufficiently related to the
subject matter of the grievance or complaint;
(b) The grievance or complaint is trivial, frivolous, vexatious, or
not made in good faith;
(c) The oversight board's resources are insufficient for an adequate
investigation of the grievance or complaint; or
(d) The grievance or complaint has been delayed too long to justify
a present examination of its merit.
(2) A decision by the oversight board to summarily dismiss a
grievance or complaint filed by a member of the public without
investigation shall not bar the oversight board from incorporating the
facts related to such grievance or complaint in other matters
investigated by the oversight board.
Sec. 8. A city shall provide its oversight board with sufficient
funding and resources to adequately perform its duties under the
Municipal Police Oversight Act. Each investigation carried out under the
authority of the oversight board shall be conducted independently of the
police department of such city. The oversight board shall employ
dedicated staff investigators, none of whom shall have previously been
affiliated with or employed by any law enforcement agency, department, or
office of such city or of the county in which the city is located.
Sec. 9. Each oversight board and the investigators employed by the
oversight board shall be empowered by ordinance with the full range of
investigative powers necessary to enable such board and investigators to
conduct fair, independent, and effective investigations. Such powers
shall include, but are not limited to, the power to:
-4-

LB276 LB276
2025 2025
(1) Request and receive from the police department of the city any
assistance and information the oversight board deems necessary for the
discharge of its duties and responsibilities;
(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, inspect and examine
all police department records and documents, including police department
personnel records and documents, that the oversight board deems relevant
to any matter being investigated by the oversight board; and
(3) Issue subpoenas, enforceable by action in an appropriate court,
to compel any person to appear, give sworn testimony, or produce
documentary or other evidence deemed relevant to a matter under
investigation by the oversight board.
Sec. 10. To the extent applicable, each oversight board and the
investigators employed by an oversight board shall, in evaluating matters
under investigation or review by the oversight board, consult relevant
standards promulgated by the Nebraska Commission on Law Enforcement and
Criminal Justice and the Nebraska Police Standards Advisory Council.
Sec. 11. (1) After an investigator employed by an oversight board
has completed an investigation of any matter within the authority of the
oversight board, the investigator shall submit a report in writing to the
oversight board summarizing the:
(a) Findings of fact relative to the matter; and
(b) Recommendations to the oversight board relating to the
disposition of the matter.
(2) After receiving such report, the oversight board shall place the
matter on its agenda for the oversight board's next public meeting, and
at that meeting the oversight board shall determine the disposition of
the matter by a majority vote of all members of the oversight board. The
oversight board shall immediately thereafter publish its conclusions and
recommendations in a written summary transmitted to the city police
department, the mayor, and the city council.
(3) When it appears there may have been criminal conduct by any
-5-

LB276 LB276
2025 2025
police officer involved in a matter that was investigated by the
oversight board, the oversight board shall also submit its written
summary on the matter, along with any evidence in support of possible
criminal proceedings, to the county attorney of the county in which such
potential criminal conduct occurred.
(4) All written summaries prepared by an oversight board shall
incorporate verbatim copies of the written report submitted to the
oversight board by the investigator. The oversight board may also submit
such special reports as the oversight board may deem necessary to the
police department, the mayor, and the city council of such city.
(5) At its sole discretion, an oversight board may publish any of
its written summaries and reports, including by releasing such written
summaries and reports to the news media.
Sec. 12. If an oversight board submits a summary or report to the
police department making specific recommendations for action to be taken
by the police department, the police department shall be required by city
ordinance to submit a timely response to the oversight board explaining
the reasons for the police department's acceptance or rejection of such
recommendations.
Sec. 13. No member or employee of an oversight board shall be held
civilly liable for any actions taken or decisions made in good faith
under the Municipal Police Oversight Act.
Sec. 14. (1) All written summaries and reports prepared by an
oversight board, including the verbatim copies of the written reports
submitted to the oversight board by investigators employed by the
oversight board, shall be considered public records for purposes of
sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.
(2) All responses submitted to an oversight board pursuant to
section 12 of this act shall be considered public records for purposes of
sections 84-712 to 84-712.09.
(3) Subdivision (8) of section 84-712.05 shall not apply to the
-6-

LB276 LB276
2025 2025
written summaries and reports prepared by an oversight board, including
verbatim copies of the written reports submitted to the oversight board
by investigators, or the responses submitted to the oversight board
pursuant to section 12 of this act.
Sec. 15. All meetings of an oversight board shall be public
meetings conducted in compliance with the Open Meetings Act.
Sec. 16. No city or city police department may negotiate or agree
to any employment contract or collective-bargaining agreement that would
conflict with or abrogate the authority of an oversight board created
pursuant to the Municipal Police Oversight Act. Any provision of any
employment contract or collective-bargaining agreement entered into after
the effective date of this act that conflicts with or abrogates the
authority of an oversight board created pursuant to the Municipal Police
Oversight Act is null and void.
Sec. 17. (1) Beginning September 1, 2025, each city attorney and
county attorney and the Attorney General shall maintain a Brady and
Giglio list in accordance with this section. The list shall identify law
enforcement officers who, due to misconduct or otherwise, have impaired
their own credibility such that disclosure to the defendant is required
under Brady v. Maryland, 373 U.S. 83 (1963), and Giglio v. United States,
405 U.S. 150 (1972), and subsequent cases of the Supreme Court of the
United States and the Supreme Court of Nebraska. The list shall contain a
description of the reason disclosure is required.
(2) The list required by this section is a public document. A city
attorney shall post such list on the city's website. A county attorney
shall post such list on the county's website. The Attorney General shall
post such list on the Attorney General's website. The list shall be
updated at least monthly.
(3) On or before September 1, 2025, the Nebraska Commission on Law
Enforcement and Criminal Justice shall adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section, including, but not limited to,
-7-

LB276 LB276
2025 2025
criteria and processes for determining when disclosure is required and
what is required to be disclosed.
Sec. 18. Section 29-411, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
29-411 In executing a warrant for the arrest of a person charged
with an offense, or a search warrant, or when authorized to make an
arrest for a felony without a warrant, the officer may break open any
outer or inner door or window of a dwelling house or other building, if,
after notice of his or her office and purpose, the officer he is refused
admittance ; or without giving notice of his authority and purpose, if
the judge or magistrate issuing a search warrant has inserted a direction
therein that the officer executing it shall not be required to give such
notice, but the political subdivision from which such officer is elected
or appointed shall be liable for all damages to the property in gaining
admission. The judge or magistrate may so direct only upon proof under
oath, to his satisfaction that the property sought may be easily or
quickly destroyed or disposed of, or that danger to the life or limb of
the officer or another may result, if such notice be given; but this
section is not intended to authorize any officer executing a search
warrant to enter any house or building not described in the warrant.
Sec. 19. (1) For purposes of this section, no-knock warrant means
an arrest warrant or a search warrant authorizing entry into any dwelling
house or other building that expressly authorizes a peace officer to
dispense with the requirement to knock and announce the peace officer's
presence prior to the execution of the warrant.
(2) No judge or magistrate shall issue a no-knock warrant.
Sec. 20. Section 81-1414.15, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-1414.15 (1) The chief of police, sheriff, Superintendent of Law
Enforcement and Public Safety, or the head administrator of a law
enforcement agency or an agency employing a law enforcement officer shall
-8-

LB276 LB276
2025 2025
submit a personnel change in status form as approved by the council to
the director of the training center within seven calendar days after the
date a law enforcement officer is hired by the agency or leaves
employment with the agency.
(2) Each law enforcement agency or agency employing a law
enforcement officer shall maintain a record regarding the reason or
reasons for, and circumstances surrounding, a separation of service for
each law enforcement officer employed by that agency. Such record shall
be retained for five years following a law enforcement officer's
separation from the agency.
(3) Each law enforcement agency or agency employing a law
enforcement officer shall maintain any and all records of officer conduct
which could constitute grounds for revocation or suspension of a law
enforcement certification by the commission. Such record shall include
any and all records of conduct which could constitute grounds for
revocation or suspension under subdivision (6) of section 81-1403. Such
record, which shall include the name of the law enforcement officer,
shall be permanently retained and shall not be destroyed. shall be
retained for the duration of the law enforcement officer's employment
with the agency and for ten years following his or her separation from
the agency.
(4) The chief of police, sheriff, Superintendent of Law Enforcement
and Public Safety, or the head administrator of a law enforcement agency
or an agency employing a law enforcement officer shall make a report to
the commission of any law enforcement officer who is terminated from
employment or allowed to resign in lieu of termination for conduct
described in subdivision (6) of section 81-1403. The report shall
include, but not be limited to, a summary of the allegations pertaining
to the officer and identification of any witnesses relevant to the
allegations, and shall be filed with the commission within thirty
calendar days of the termination or resignation in lieu of termination.
-9-

LB276 LB276
2025 2025
(5) Failure to comply with this section shall constitute neglect of
duty.
Sec. 21. Section 81-1414.19, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska,
is amended to read:
81-1414.19 (1) The On or before July 1, 2022, the commission shall
post on its public website a list of all law enforcement officers who
have, on or after January 1, 2021:
(a) Voluntarily surrendered their certifications or had their
certifications revoked;
(b) Been convicted of or pleaded guilty or nolo contendere to a
felony or a Class I misdemeanor; or
(c) Upon adjudication by the council, been found to have engaged in
serious misconduct.
(2) The list provided for in this section shall be accompanied on
the commission's public website by a letter that includes, for each law
enforcement officer on such list:
(a) The officer's name, rank, and the law enforcement agency for
which such officer works or most recently worked;
(b) A statement indicating the reason such officer's name is on the
list;
(c) A description of any discipline imposed; and
(d) An affirmation, signed by the chief of police, sheriff, or the
head administrator of the officer's law enforcement agency or the
Superintendent of Law Enforcement and Public Safety affirming the truth
and accuracy of the matters stated in the letter.
(3) The list provided for in this section shall include, for each
law enforcement officer on such list, an indication of whether the
officer's certification is active or has been suspended or revoked or is
otherwise inactive.
(4) Any (3) Beginning July 1, 2022, any time a law enforcement
officer voluntarily surrenders such officer's certification, has such
-10-

LB276 LB276
2025 2025
certification revoked, or is adjudicated by the council to have engaged
in serious misconduct, the council shall notify the commission within
thirty days after such surrender, revocation, or adjudication.
(5) The (4) By July 1, 2022, the council shall establish a
procedure, including an opportunity for a hearing, by which a law
enforcement officer may challenge the inclusion of such officer's name on
the list.
Sec. 22. The Revisor of Statutes shall assign sections 1 to 16 of
this act to Chapter 18.
Sec. 23. Original sections 29-411, 81-1414.15, and 81-1414.19,
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 24. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-11-